Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1831YH (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. 213 Section 1. Section 510B.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. âMail order pharmacy providerâ means a 3 pharmacy whose primary business is to dispense a prescription 4 drug or device under a prescription drug order and to deliver 5 the prescription drug or device to a covered person by mail, 6 common carrier, or delivery service. 7 Sec. 2. Section 510B.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsections: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Any amount paid by a covered person for 10 a prescription drug purchased pursuant to this section shall 11 be applied to any deductible imposed by the covered personâs 12 health benefit plan in accordance with the health benefit plan 13 coverage documents. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A covered person shall not be prohibited 15 from filling a prescription drug order at any pharmacy located 16 in the state provided that the pharmacy accepts the same terms 17 and conditions as the pharmacies participating in the covered 18 personâs health benefit planâs network. 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Excluding incentives in value-based 20 programs established by a health carrier or a pharmacy benefits 21 manager to promote the use of higher quality pharmacies, 22 a pharmacy benefits manager shall not impose different 23 cost-sharing or additional fees on a covered person based on 24 the pharmacy at which the covered person fills the covered 25 personâs prescription drug order. 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. A pharmacy benefits manager shall 27 not require a covered person, as a condition of payment 28 or reimbursement, to purchase pharmacy services, including 29 prescription drugs, exclusively through a mail order pharmacy 30 provider. 31 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to pharmacy 32 benefits managers that manage a health carrierâs prescription 33 drug benefit in the state on or after the effective date of 34 this Act. 35 -1- LSB 1831YH (2) 91 nls/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 213